District of Columbia statutes.
8-2010

Sick or injured horses.

(a)

The owner, operator, or custodian of a horse engaged in the horse-drawn carriage trade that is in pain, sick, diseased, lame, or injured shall take action to obtain immediate veterinary treatment, care, and attention for the horse.

(b)

An injured, sick, diseased, or lame horse shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of except in a humane manner.

(c)

No person shall drive, use, or work an injured, sick, diseased, or lame horse in the horse-drawn carriage trade.

History

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-224, § 11, 38 DCR 207

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1040.